District of Columbia statutes.
8-651.05

Notification requirements for removal of trees on public space.

(a)

Unless the tree is a Hazardous Tree, before removing a tree on public space, the Director shall provide not less than 15 days written notice to the affected Advisory Neighborhood Commission, and shall set forth the reason for the proposed removal.

(b)

Public utility companies shall provide not less than 20 days written notice to the Director or his or her designee prior to performing any work which affects trees on public space, except for permitted utility construction or emergency work conducted by a public utility company regulated by the Public Service Commission, as provided in § 8-651.03(a).

June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-309, § 105, 50 DCR 888

History